Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.270

Salary withheld unless employment is in accord with chapter—Certification of payrolls, procedures.

A disbursing officer shall not pay any employee holding a position covered by this chapter unless the employment is in accordance with this chapter or the rules, regulations and orders issued hereunder. The directors of enterprise services and financial management shall jointly establish procedures for the certification of payrolls.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 418; 2002 c 354 s 217; 1979 c 151 s 61; 1961 c 1 s 27 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.